en: Cooked crepe filled with mushrooms, Crepe filled with mushrooms and bechamel sauce cooked, buckwheat crepe filled with mushrooms and bechamel sauce cooked
fr: Galette cuites aux champignons, Galette fourrée béchamel champignon, Galette fourrée béchamel champignon cuite

en: Crepe filled with egg ham and cheese, buckwheat crepe filled with egg ham and cheese
fr: Crêpe complète, Galette complète, Crêpe œuf jambon fromage, Galette œuf jambon fromage

en: Buckwheat crepe filled with cheese ham and mushrooms, Buckwheat crepe filled with cheese ham mushrooms and bechamel sauce, Crepe filled with cheese ham mushrooms and bechamel sauce
fr: Crêpes jambon fromage champignon, Crêpe fourrée béchamel jambon fromage champignon, Galettes jambon fromage champignon, Galette fourrée béchamel jambon fromage champignon

en: Crepes filled with fish, Buckwheat crepes filled with fish
fr: Crêpes au poisson, Crêpes fourrées au poisson, Galettes fourrées au poisson

en: Crepes filled with seafood, Buckwheat crepes filled with seafood
fr: Crêpes fourrée aux fruits de mer, Galettes fourrées aux fruits de mer

en: Crepe filled with scallops, Buckwheat crepe with scallops
fr: Crêpe aux noix de St Jacques, Galette aux noix de St Jacques

en: Pork sausage stew with cabbage carrots and potatoes
fr: Potées auvergnates, Potée auvergnate avec chou et porc

en: Stuffed cabbage
bg: Сарми
fr: Chou farci
hr: Punjeni kupus
pl: Gołąbki
sr: Сарма
ua: Голубці

en: Caviars
de: Kaviar
es: Caviar
fi: kaviaarit
fr: Caviars, Caviar
hr: Kavijari
it: Caviale
lt: Ikrai
nl: Kaviaar
pl: kawior
ro: Caviar
tr: Havyar

en: Semi-preserved caviar
fr: Caviar en semi-conserve
hr: Polukonzervirani kavijar
ja: キャビア

en: Farmed caviars
de: Zuchtkaviar
fr: Caviars d'élevage
hr: Uzgojeni kavijari
nl: Gekweekte kaviaar

en: Baeri caviars
de: Kaviar vom Acipenser baerii
fr: Caviar Baeri, Baeri, Caviar d'esturgeon sibérien, Acipenser baerii
hr: Baeri kavijar
nl: Baeri kaviaar

fr: Caviar d'esturgeon blanc, Acipenser transmontanus
de: Weißer Kaviar

fr: Caviar de Acipenser gueldenstaedtii, Caviar d'esturgeon russe, Caviar d'esturgeon du Danube, Diamond Sturgeon
de: Kaviar vom Acipenser gueldenstaedtii

en: Wild caviars
de: Wildkaviar
hr: Divlji kavijari
it: Caviali selvatici
nl: Wilde kaviaar

en: Beluga caviar
de: Belugakaviar
fr: Caviar béluga, Caviar de béluga, Caviar d'Huso Huso
hr: Beluga kavijar
nl: Beluga kaviaar

en: Hackeleback caviars
de: Hackleback Kaviar
fr: Caviar de hackeleback
hr: Hackleback kavijar

en: Paddlefish caviars
de: Paddlefish Kaviar, Kaviar vom Löffelstör
fr: Caviar de paddlefish
hr: Kavijar veslonoša

en: Ossetra caviar
de: Ossietra Kaviar
fr: Caviar osciètre, Caviar d'osciètre, Caviar ossiètre, Caviar d'ossiètre, Acipenser Gueldenstaedtii, Acipenser Persicus
hr: Ossetra kavijar
nl: Ossetra kaviaar

en: Sevruga caviar
de: Sevruga Kaviar
fr: Caviar sevruga, Caviar de sevruga, Acipenser stellatus, Caviar d'esturgeon étoilé
hr: Sevruga kavijar